District of Columbia statutes.
16-583

No garnishment before judgment.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in the District of Columbia Child Support Enforcement Amendment Act of 1985 or as provided in the D.C. Official Code, section 16-916, before entry of a judgment in an action against a debtor, the creditor may not obtain an interest in any property of the debtor by attachment, garnishment, or like proceedings.

(b)

The holder who is served an order of withholding under this subchapter may deduct and retain from the obligor’s earnings or other income an additional $2.00 over the withholding amount for expenses incurred as a result of the withholding.

History

Dec. 17, 1971, 85 Stat. 679, Pub. L. 92-200, § 7
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 33(a)(2), 33 DCR 6710

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-583.
1973 Ed., § 16-583.

References in Text

The “District of Columbia Child Support Enforcement Amendment Act of 1985,” referred to in subsection (a), is D.C. Law 6-166 which is codified principally as § 46-201 et seq.